Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 19 Contagious and Infectious Diseases Among Livestock

Cross references. —

As to authorizing legislature to provide for protection of livestock against infectious and contagious diseases, see art. 19, § 1, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture §§ 38 to 48; 35A Am. Jur. 2d Food § 1 et seq.

Admissibility of opinion evidence of lay witnesses as to diseases and physical condition of animals, 49 ALR2d 932.

Communicable disease, extent of liability of seller of livestock infected with, 87 ALR2d 1317.

Extent of liability of seller of livestock infected with communicable disease, 14 ALR4th 1096.

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 66 to 68, 73 to 98; 36A C.J.S. Food §§ 1 to 49.